District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.52

Composition.

(a)

Each individual (except for employees appointed pursuant to §§ 1-609.01 to 1-609.08 or subchapters VIII-A, VIII-B, or X-A of this chapter, employees of the Board of Education, employees of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, and uniformed members of the Metropolitan Police Department or the D.C. Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department) who meets the definition of “management employee” pursuant to § 1-614.11(5) shall be in the Management Supervisory Service.

(b)

Consistent with the provisions of subchapter XVII of this chapter, any individual occupying a position included in a recognized collective bargaining unit shall not be included in the Management Supervisory Service.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 952
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(h), 46 DCR 1318
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 108(a), 47 DCR 520
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-132, § 2(a), 47 DCR 2694
1981 Ed., § 1-610.52.
D.C. Law 13-91 substituted “XI-A of this chapter” for “XI of this chapter”.
D.C. Law 13-132 designated the existing text as subsec. (a), and added subsec. (b).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Management Supervisory Service Exclusion Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-86, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2837).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(h) of the Legal Service Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-620, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1343).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Management Supervisory Service Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (the 2nd) (D.C. Act 13-197, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10442).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Management Supervisory Service Exclusion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-283, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2029).
Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-609.51.